Tennessee statutes. Title 25 Judgments
Chapter 3

Judgment by Motion

25-3-101. Motion by plaintiff against executive officer.

Judgment by motion may be had against any sheriff, coroner, or constable, or other executive officer, to whom an execution is directed and received by such officer for the amount due upon such execution, and twelve and one-half percent (12½%) damages, in cases when such officer:

fails to make due and proper return of such execution;

makes a false or insufficient return; or

fails to pay over money collected on such execution.

Code 1858, § 3594 (deriv. Acts 1803, ch. 18, §§ 1, 2; 1835-1836, ch. 17, § 4; 1835-1836, ch. 19, § 6); Shan., § 5359; Code 1932, § 9518; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-301.

Cross-References. Clerk or judge failing to pay over revenue, §§9-2-115,9-2-117.

Failure to pay over redemption money, §66-8-113.

Motion against collector of revenue, §§67-1-1602(b) —67-1-1611.

Motion against county trustee, §§8-11-106 —8-11-109.

Motion against sheriff, §8-8-204.

Motion against tax collector on failure to settle, §67-1-1602.

Motions cognizable before general sessions judge, §16-15-733.

Summary judgment, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 56.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 8, 560.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 30; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of the Peace and General Sessions Court, § 17; 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, §§ 4, 6; 22 Tenn. Juris., Sheriffs, §§ 15, 18, 23, 26.

Law Reviews.

Summary Judgment Procedure for Tennessee (Chas. S. Coffey), 16 Tenn. L. Rev. 393.

Trick or Treat? Summary Judgment in Tennessee after Hannan V. Alltel Publishing Co. (Judy M. Cornett), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 305 (2010).

Attorney General Opinions. Enforcement of statutory requirements for constables, OAG 99-025, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 26 (2/16/99).

25-3-102. Motion by defendant against executive officer.

Such officers are in like manner liable to the defendant in an execution, upon motion:

For the failure to pay over, on demand, any excess of money which may remain upon a sale by execution, after the satisfaction thereof, and all commissions and costs, the amount of such excess, with interest and damages; or

For failing to pay over, on demand, money paid or collected on an execution, the whole or any part of which is enjoined in chancery, or to which the defendant is otherwise legally entitled, the amount so enjoined or to which the defendant is entitled, with interest and damages.

Code 1858, § 3595 (deriv. Acts 1817, ch. 54, § 1); Shan., § 5360; Code 1932, § 9519; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-302.

Cross-References. Motions cognizable before general sessions judge, §16-15-733.

25-3-103. Motion for costs.

Such officers are also liable to judgment by motion in favor of clerks, other executive officers, and witnesses, for the amounts, with interest, respectively due them in the bill of costs endorsed on an execution, in the same cases in which the plaintiff or the defendant in the execution might recover judgment by motion for the principal, or any part thereof.

Code 1858, § 3596 (deriv. Acts 1824, ch. 16, §§ 1, 2); Shan., § 5361; Code 1932, § 9520; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-303.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 12; 8 Tenn. Juris., Costs, § 42.

25-3-104. Collections on causes cognizable before general sessions judge.

Sheriffs, coroners, and constables are liable to judgment by motion before a judge of the court of general sessions, in favor of the party interested, for any money collected or received by them upon any debt or demand cognizable before a judge of the court of general sessions, and put into their hands for collection, whether such money was received before or after the issuance of a warrant for such debt or demand, and with or without judgment or execution.

The judgment shall be for the amount so received, with interest and damages.

Code 1858, § 3600 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 37); Shan., § 5365; Code 1932, § 9524; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-304.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Sheriffs, §§ 7, 15, 21, 24.

25-3-105. Penalty for failure to return process.

Any sheriff or other officer failing to execute and make return of any process issued from any court of record, and delivered to such officer twenty (20) days before the return day, is liable to a penalty of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125), to be recovered by the party aggrieved, on motion before the court to which the process is returnable.

If the process has been issued to an officer of another county, the officer shall have until the next term to show cause against such judgment, on scire facias made known to such officer.

Any sheriff or other officer failing to execute and make return of any process delivered to that officer and issued from any general sessions court, within sixty (60) days after the issuance of the same, is liable to a penalty of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125), to be recovered by the party aggrieved, on motion before the court to which the process is returnable.

If the process has been issued to an officer of another county, the officer shall have sixty (60) days to show cause against such judgment, on notice made known to such officer.

Code 1858, §§ 3603, 3604 (deriv. Acts 1777, ch. 8, § 5); Shan., §§ 5368, 5369; Code 1932, §§ 9527, 9528; Acts 1974, ch. 551, § 1; 1975, ch. 321, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-305.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Sheriffs, § 15.

Attorney General Opinions. Enforcement of statutory requirements for constables, OAG 99-025, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 26 (2/16/99).

25-3-106. Death of officer or surety.

In case of the death of an officer or either of the officer's sureties, pending a motion against the officer or sureties, it may be revived against the personal representative of the deceased in the same manner as other suits are revived.

Code 1858, § 3597 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 39, § 1); Shan., § 5362; Code 1932, § 9521; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-306.

Cross-References. Actions against delinquent collectors, judgment against surviving principal and sureties, §67-1-1609.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 707.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Abatement, Survival and Revival, § 27; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Officers, § 19.

25-3-107. Execution as evidence.

On the trial of the motion, a copy of the execution made and certified by the clerk, with the return thereon, if any was made, or a statement that no return was made, if such be the fact, together with the clerk's certificate that the execution was received by the sheriff, or sent to the sheriff by mail, is evidence of the facts so certified, without producing a transcript of the entire record, or compelling the clerk personally to attend.

Code 1858, § 3598; Shan., § 5363; Code 1932, § 9522; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-307.

25-3-108. Evidence of receipt of execution by officer.

If a clerk certifies, in accordance with § 25-3-107, that the execution was sent to an officer by mail, it is prima facie evidence that the writ was received by the officer unless the officer states, under written oath, that the writ was never received.

In such case, the officer shall have notice of the motion.

Code 1858, § 3599; Shan., § 5364; Code 1932, § 9523; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-308.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Sheriffs, § 28.

25-3-109. Proof of return from another county.

It shall be a good defense to a motion against an officer residing in any county other than that from which an execution issued, for the officer to show by proof that in due time the process was placed in regular mail, at the courthouse of the county to which the execution was directed, with the proper return thereon, sealed up in the presence of the postmaster, directed to the clerk of the court from which the same issued.

Code 1858, § 3601 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 19, § 6); Shan., § 5366; Code 1932, § 9525; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-309.

25-3-110. Inability to return as defense.

The inability to make the prescribed return of a general sessions judge's execution, on account of sickness, high water, or engagement in executing any precept in behalf of the state, will be a sufficient reason to authorize a judge of the court of general sessions, before whom the motion has been made, to discharge the officer for the officer's failure to make return as required.

Code 1858, § 3602 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 17, § 4); Shan., § 5367; Code 1932, § 9526; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-310.

Cross-References. Excuse of inability to return, §16-15-733.

25-3-111. Judgment against clerks.

Judgment may be had summarily by motion against the clerk of any court in this state, in the following cases:

For failing to pay over to the party entitled, on demand, money received by the clerk on any judgment or execution, or paid into court upon a plea of tender or any other plea, or under an order or rule of court, judgment for the sum so received, with interest, and twelve and one-half percent (12½%) damages; or

For delinquencies in regard to revenue, as provided in this Code.

Code 1858, § 3608 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 150, § 4); Shan., § 5373; Code 1932, § 9532; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-311.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, §§ 13, 14; 8 Tenn. Juris., Costs, §§ 42, 44; 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, § 6.

25-3-112. Judgment against special commissioner.

A special commissioner appointed by the court to sell property or to receive and collect funds, is, in all cases, liable on motion, in the same way and to the same extent as the clerks of the courts.

Code 1858, § 3610 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 166, § 5); Shan., § 5375; Code 1932, § 9534; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-313.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 14.

25-3-113. Judgment against deputy clerk.

The like remedy lies against a deputy clerk in favor of the party aggrieved, as against the clerk.

The clerk is entitled to recover by motion against the clerk's deputy and sureties, in the same way the sheriffs are entitled to recover against their deputies.

Code 1858, §§ 3611, 3612 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 41, §§ 1, 2); Shan., §§ 5376, 5377; Code 1932, §§ 9535, 9536; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-314.

25-3-114. Judgment for executive officers.

Judgment may, in like manner, be recovered summarily, on motion, in favor of sheriffs, coroners, constables, and other executive officers:

Against the obligors on bonds given to indemnify the officer for levying an execution or attachment, or for making sale of property so levied on or attached, after judgment against such officer for making such levy or sale, the judgment to be for the amount recovered against such officer, with interest;

Against the deputy of the sheriff and the sheriff's sureties for the amount of any judgment which may be rendered against the sheriff for the default of such deputy; and

Against clerks for the amount of costs due such officers, paid to such clerks.

Code 1858, § 3605 (deriv. Acts 1824, ch. 16, § 2; 1825, ch. 40, § 1; 1829, ch. 41, § 1); Shan., § 5370; Code 1932, § 9529; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-315.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Costs § 42; 14 Tenn. Juris., Indemnity, § 9; 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, § 6; 22 Tenn. Juris., Sheriffs, § 12.

25-3-115. Jurisdiction of motion on bond.

The motion on an indemnity bond may be made in any court, having jurisdiction of the amount, in the county in which the bond is given, or in which the court is held from which the process issued for the levy whereof the bond was given, or in the county of the residence of any of the obligors.

Code 1858, § 3606; Shan., § 5371; Code 1932, § 9530; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-316.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Sheriffs, § 24.

25-3-116. Jurisdiction of motion against deputy.

The motion against the deputy sheriff may be made in any court, having jurisdiction of the amount, in the county in which the bond was executed or in which judgment has been recovered against the principal for the default of the deputy, or in any county in which the deputy, or any one (1) of the deputy's sureties, may reside.

Code 1858, § 3607 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 41, § 1); Shan., § 5372; Code 1932, § 9531; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-317.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, § 6; 22 Tenn. Juris., Sheriffs, § 24.

25-3-117. Judgment against county trustee.

County trustees are required to pay all just claims against the county as they are presented, if they have money in their hands not otherwise specially appropriated, and, on failure so to do, the party aggrieved may recover judgment by motion against such trustee and any sureties of the trustee, for the amount due, with interest and damages, in the general sessions court of the county in which such trustee resides.

Code 1858, § 3613 (deriv. Acts 1821, ch. 33, § 1; 1827, ch. 49, § 25); Shan., § 5378; Code 1932, § 9537; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-318.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Abatement, Survival and Revival, § 27; 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Judgments, § 6.

25-3-118. Motion against tax collector.

A motion lies in favor of the party aggrieved, state, county, corporation, or individual, against any county trustee, assessor of property, revenue collector or commissioner, for moneys in official hands officially, and not paid over or accounted for according to law.

The recovery on such motion shall be the amount not paid over, with interest, and twelve and one-half percent (12½%) damages on the gross amount, and all costs.

Code 1858, §§ 3614, 3615 (deriv. Acts 1827, ch. 49, § 24; 1835-1836, ch. 15, § 15); Shan., §§ 5379, 5380; Code 1932, §§ 9538, 9539; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-319.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1 provided that the code commission is directed to change all references to “tax assessor”, wherever such references appear, to “assessor of property”, as such sections are amended or volumes are replaced. See §1-1-116.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, § 6; 20 Tenn. Juris., Parties, § 2.

25-3-119. Judgment against attorney.

Judgment may, in like manner, be had in favor of the party aggrieved against any attorney, upon five (5) days' notice, for any money collected or received by the attorney in that capacity, and not paid over on demand by the person entitled, or that person's agent or attorney.

Judgment shall, in such case, be given for the amount so collected or received, with interest, and twelve and one-half percent (12½%) damages, and all costs.

Code 1858, §§ 3616, 3617 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 13, § 1); Shan., §§ 5381, 5382; Code 1932, §§ 9540, 9541; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-320.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney and Client, § 12; 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, § 6.

Law Reviews.

Legal Profession — Attorney and Client, 24 Tenn. L. Rev. 611.

Malpractice at Bar (Ray L. Jenkins), 26 Tenn. L. Rev. 525.

25-3-120. Jurisdiction of motions against attorneys.

A motion against an attorney may be made in the circuit or chancery court of any county in which such attorney resides, or in which the money was collected, and if the attorney neither resides nor practices in the state, then in the circuit court of any county, and, in the latter case, without notice.

Code 1858, § 3618 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 13, § 1); Shan., § 5383; mod. Code 1932, § 9542; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-321.

25-3-121. Striking attorney from rolls.

Upon the return by proper officer of an execution issued on the judgment recovered under §§25-3-119 and25-3-120, with the endorsement that the money cannot be made, or not sufficient property of the defendant to be found to make the same, it is the duty of the court to strike such delinquent from the roll of attorneys, who shall thenceforward be disqualified to practice in the courts of this state until the debt is paid.

Code 1858, § 3619 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 13, § 2); Shan., § 5384; Code 1932, § 9543; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-322.

Law Reviews.

Legal Profession — Attorney and Client, 24 Tenn. L. Rev. 611.

25-3-122. Motion by surety.

Sureties are entitled to judgment by motion against their principals:

Whenever judgment has been rendered against them as such sureties;

Whenever such judgment, or any part thereof, has been paid by the surety.

Code 1858, § 3620 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 15, § 1; 1809 (Sept.), ch. 69, § 1); Shan., § 5385; Code 1932, § 9544; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-323.

Cross-References. Judgment for costs against surety, §20-12-135.

Power of surety to confess judgment, §25-2-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 77; 14 Tenn. Juris., Guaranty, § 2; 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, §§ 5, 6; 23 Tenn. Juris., Suretyship, § 30.

25-3-123. Joint or several motion.

Such motion may be joint or several, at the option of the sureties.

Code 1858, § 3621; Shan., § 5386; Code 1932, § 9545; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-324.

25-3-124. Surety on confessed judgment.

Sections 25-3-122 — 25-3-134 extend to all cases where the suretyship is upon any acknowledgment or confession of judgment in any court.

Code 1858, § 3635; Shan., § 5401; Code 1932, § 9560; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-325.

Cross-References. Power of surety to confess judgment, §25-2-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Suretyship, § 30.

25-3-125. Stayors.

Stayors may move against their principals and costayors in the same way, and subject to the same rules and regulations, as sureties.

Code 1858, § 3629 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 216, § 1; 1849-1850, ch. 38, § 3); Shan., § 5394; Code 1932, § 9553; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-326.

25-3-126. Accommodation endorsers.

Accommodation endorsers may move against their principals in the same way as, and subject to all the rules and regulations that govern motions by, sureties against their principals.

Code 1858, § 3630 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 38, §§ 1, 2; 1855-1856, ch. 75); Shan., § 5395; Code 1932, § 9554; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-327.

25-3-127. Motion against cosurety.

A cosurety or comaker against whom judgment has been rendered for the whole debt, or who has paid the same or more than the ratable share of such judgment, may have judgment on motion, against all of the other parties to the instrument liable to such cosurety or comaker, whether included in the original judgment or not, for the ratable share of each.

Code 1858, § 3625 (deriv. Acts 1809 (Sept.), ch. 69, §§ 2, 3); Acts 1870-1871, ch. 99; Shan., § 5390; mod. Code 1932, § 9549; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-328.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, § 5; 23 Tenn. Juris., Suretyship, § 31.

25-3-128. Personal representatives.

The remedies given by §§ 25-3-122 — 25-3-134 lie both for and against the personal representatives of deceased persons.

Where a judgment by motion is rendered against an executor or administrator without notice, founded on a demand against the deceased, on scire facias to make the defendant liable out of the defendant's own estate, the defendant shall be permitted to make any defense the defendant might have made to the original motion.

Code 1858, §§ 3626, 3627 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 18, § 2); Shan., §§ 5391, 5392; Code 1932, §§ 9550, 9551; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-329.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 707.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators § 93; 22 Tenn. Juris., Sheriffs, § 26.

25-3-129. Jurisdiction of motions.

Motions under §§ 25-3-122 — 25-3-134 may be made in any court, having cognizance of the amount.

They may also, in all cases, be made in the court by which the judgment was rendered against such surety, stayor, or accommodation endorser.

Code 1858, §§ 3632, 3633 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 38, §§ 1-3; 1853-1854, ch. 52, § 1); Shan., §§ 5397, 5398; Code 1932, §§ 9556, 9557; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-330.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Suretyship, § 30.

25-3-130. Jurisdiction of special courts.

The special criminal and other courts have the power to render judgments by motion in favor of sureties, as against principals, or in favor of cosureties, as against each other, upon any judgment rendered in such courts, upon the same terms and conditions as regards notice to the party sought to be made liable, that the circuit courts have.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 6, § 1; Shan., § 5399; mod. Code 1932, § 9558; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-331.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Suretyship, § 30.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Criminal Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 319.

25-3-131. Production of records.

On the trial of any of the motions provided for in §§25-3-122 —25-3-134, the plaintiff shall produce the instrument creating the suretyship, or a certified copy thereof, and a copy of the record showing the recovery of judgment.

Code 1858, § 3631 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 153, § 1); Shan., § 5396; Code 1932, § 9555; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-332.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Suretyship, § 30.

25-3-132. Trial of fact of suretyship.

If the fact of suretyship does not appear upon the face of the proceedings on which judgment has been had or payment made, or of the instrument on which the motion under §§25-3-122 —25-3-134 is founded, a jury shall be immediately impaneled to try the fact.

Code 1858, § 3623 (deriv. Acts 1809 (Sept.), ch. 69, § 2); Shan., § 5388; Code 1932, § 9547; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-333.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 17; 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, §§ 5, 8.

25-3-133. Trial of fact of cosuretyship.

In all cases of motions by sureties against cosureties, if the fact of the joint suretyship does not appear on the face of the papers or judicial proceedings on which the motion is based, the fact shall be ascertained by a jury to be immediately impaneled, if demanded in a court of record.

Code 1858, § 3628 (deriv. Acts 1809 (Sept.), ch. 69, § 3); Shan., § 5393; mod. Code 1932, § 9552; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-334.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, §§ 5, 8.

25-3-134. Amount of judgment.

The recovery under §§25-3-122 —25-3-133 shall include interest and costs of the original judgment, and commissions for collecting the same, if collected, and the costs of the motion, unless otherwise directed. The judgment shall be for the amount of the recovery or payment, as the case may be, with interest and costs.

Code 1858, §§ 3622, 3634; Shan., §§ 5387, 5400; Code 1932, §§ 9546, 9559; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-335.

25-3-135. Parties to motions for summary judgment in general.

A motion may be made by the party aggrieved, or the aggrieved party's legal representatives, against the person in default, and such other persons made liable with the person in default as may be in existence at the time of the motion.

Code 1858, § 3583; Shan., § 5347; Code 1932, § 9507; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-336.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 707.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Abatement, Survival and Revival, § 27; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Officers, § 19; 22 Tenn. Juris., Sheriffs, § 26; 23 Tenn. Juris., Suretyship, § 31.

25-3-136. Motion on defective bond.

Whenever by this chapter a motion is authorized against an officer, or other person acting under the orders of court, it carries with it the right to move against such person or officer and the sureties on that officer's official bond of such officer or other person, or other bond executed in the discharge of the particular duty, although such bond may not be in strict compliance with the law.

Code 1858, § 3584; Shan., § 5348; Code 1932, § 9508; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-337.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 14.

25-3-137. Times notice not required.

No notice of the motion is required, if made at the return term of the process in a court of record, where the cause of motion is official delinquency, or within six (6) months after the right to the motion has accrued in any other case.

Code 1858, § 3585; Shan., § 5350; Code 1932, § 9509; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-338.

Cross-References. Notice before general sessions judges, §16-15-733.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, § 7; 22 Tenn. Juris., Sheriffs, § 25.

25-3-138. Notice to constables.

Section 25-3-137 does not apply to constables, who shall be entitled to notice in all cases of motion against them for official delinquency.

Code 1858, § 3586; Shan., § 5351; Code 1932, § 9510; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-339.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Sheriffs, § 25.

25-3-139. Security for costs.

The plaintiff in any motion may be required to give security for the cost of suits, as in other cases.

Code 1858, § 3588; Shan., § 5353; Code 1932, § 9512; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-341.

25-3-140. Venue of motions.

The motion shall be made, unless in cases where otherwise provided by this Code, as follows:

Where the motion is against an officer for official default, it may be made in the court in which the officer was acting officially at the time, or in the court to which process was returnable, when the default consists in the failure to execute or return process, or to pay over money collected thereon;

Where the motion is by a surety, it may be made in the court in which judgment has been rendered against that surety, or in the county in which any one (1) of the defendants resides;

In all other cases, the motion should be made in the county in which the defendants, or some one of them, reside, and if none of them has any permanent residence in the state, then in any county.

“Court,” in this section, embraces judges of the courts of general sessions, and a motion lies in all cases before the general sessions judge having jurisdiction of the case on which the motion is based.

Code 1858, §§ 3589, 3590 (deriv. Acts 1803, ch. 18, § 1; 1809 (Sept.), ch. 69, § 1; 1835-1836, ch. 17, § 4; 1835-1836, ch. 19, § 6); Shan., §§ 5354, 5355; Code 1932, §§ 9513, 9514; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-342.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, § 5; 23 Tenn. Juris., Suretyship, § 30.

25-3-141. Concurrent jurisdiction of circuit court.

The circuit court has concurrent jurisdiction of all motions cognizable before a judge of the court of general sessions.

Code 1858, § 3591; Shan., § 5356; Code 1932, § 9515; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-343.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, § 5.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

25-3-142. Amount of recovery.

Whenever damages on a motion are given, in the absence of any specific amount mentioned, the plaintiff will be entitled to recover twelve and one-half percent (12½%) on the whole amount, principal and interest, due at the time of the rendition of the judgment.

Code 1858, § 3592 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 19, § 6); Shan., § 5357; Code 1932, § 9516; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-344.

25-3-143. Remedy cumulative.

The remedy by motion is cumulative, and does not deprive the plaintiff of any other action or remedy allowed by law for the plaintiff's redress.

Code 1858, § 3593; Shan., § 5358; Code 1932, § 9517; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-345.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Contribution and Exoneration, § 18; 19 Tenn. Juris., Motions and Summary Proceedings, § 3.

25-3-144. Return and reimbursement of funds wrongfully granted against individual protected by Servicemembers Civil Relief Act.

If a court wrongly grants a default decision imposing an obligation for child support from or against an eligible individual protected under the federal Servicemembers Civil Relief Act (50 U.S.C. § 501 et seq.), the court shall issue an order to the individual receiving funds that the funds shall be returned and reimbursed.

Acts 2012, ch. 928, § 1.